District of Columbia statutes.
9-804

Maintenance and operation.

The Administrator shall have control over and responsibility for the care, operation, maintenance, improvements, and protection of the airport, together with the power to make and amend such rules and regulations as he may deem necessary to the proper exercise thereof; provided, that the authority herein contained may be delegated by the Administrator to such official or officials of the Federal Aviation Agency as the Administrator may designate.

History

Sept. 7, 1950, 64 Stat. 771, ch. 905, § 4
Aug. 23, 1958, 72 Stat. 807, Pub. L. 85-726, title XIV, § 1402(g)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-1204.
1973 Ed., § 7-1404.